Utah statutes.
76-5-109.1.   Commission of domestic violence in the presence of a child.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Cohabitant" has the same meaning as defined in Section 78B-7-102.

(b)  "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as in Section 77-36-1.

(c)  "In the presence of a child" means:

(i)  in the physical presence of a child; or

(ii)  having knowledge that a child is present and may see or hear an act of domestic violence.

(2)  A person commits domestic violence in the presence of a child if the person:

(a)  commits or attempts to commit criminal homicide, as defined in Section 76-5-201, against a cohabitant in the presence of a child; or

(b)  intentionally causes serious bodily injury to a cohabitant or uses a dangerous weapon, as defined in Section 76-1-601, or other means or force likely to produce death or serious bodily injury against a cohabitant, in the presence of a child; or

(c)  under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection (2)(a) or (b), commits an act of domestic violence in the presence of a child.

(3) (a)  A person who violates Subsection (2)(a) or (b) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(b)  A person who violates Subsection (2)(c) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(4)  A charge under this section is separate and distinct from, and is in addition to, a charge of domestic violence where the victim is the cohabitant.  Either or both charges may be filed by the prosecutor.

(5)  A person who commits a violation of this section when more than one child is present is guilty of one offense of domestic violence in the presence of a child regarding each child present when the violation occurred.

